Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 18 Fraud and False Dealing

11-18-1.
Giving false document to agent, employee, or public official.

No person shall knowingly give to any agent, employee, servant in public or private employ, or public official any receipt, account, or other document in respect of which the principal, master, or employer, or state, city, or town of which he or she is an official is interested, which contains any statement which is false or erroneous, or defective in any important particular, and which, to his or her knowledge, is intended to mislead the principal, master, employer, or state, city, or town of which he or she is an official.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, shall be imprisoned, with or without hard labor, for a term not exceeding one year or be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1219, §§ 3, 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, §§ 23, 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, §§ 23, 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, §§ 23, 24; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-1

.

11-18-1.1.
Fraudulent insurance claims for stolen motor vehicles.

Any person who knowingly and with criminal intent shall file a fraudulent claim with an insurance company for the purpose of securing money based on a claim of a stolen motor vehicle when, in fact, the motor vehicle did not exist or was not stolen, shall be guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 221, § 13.

11-18-1.2.
False statement to obtain replacement public assistance check or authorization.

Any person who shall knowingly and intentionally file or cause to be filed with the department of human services, or any employee or agent of the department, any statement or affidavit in writing which is false or erroneous, or defective in any important particular, and which, to his or her knowledge, is intended to report that one or more public assistance benefit checks or authorizations issued pursuant to chapter 6 of title 40, has been lost, destroyed, or stolen and is intended to induce or cause the department or its employees or agents, to issue a replacement check or authorization, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both, if the total value of the replacement checks or authorization(s) so issued in any period of twelve (12) consecutive months shall exceed five hundred dollars ($500), or shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both, if the value of the replacement check or authorization so issued shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500). All criminal actions for any violation of this section shall be prosecuted by the attorney general. The statement or affidavit shall contain language notifying the signer, in conspicuous language, that any false statement on the statement or affidavit is punishable by up to five (5) years imprisonment and a five thousand dollar ($5,000) fine.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 237, § 1.

11-18-1.3.
False statement to fraudulently obtain license or registration.

Any person who shall knowingly and intentionally prepare, file or cause to be filed with the division of motor vehicles, or any employee or agent of the division of motor vehicles, any application, statement or affidavit in writing which is knowingly false in any important particular, and which, to his or her knowledge, is intended to fraudulently induce or cause the department or its employees or agents, to issue a registration or license, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 150, § 1.

11-18-2.
False information to registrar of vital statistics.

Every person who shall knowingly furnish or cause to be furnished to the registrar of vital statistics of any city or town false information concerning any birth, marriage, death and/or divorce shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisoned not exceeding one year, or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 610, § 46; P.L. 1949, ch. 2310, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-2

.

11-18-3.
Fraudulent notice to newspaper of birth, marriage, or death.

Every person who shall willfully send to the publishers of any newspaper, for the purpose of publication, a fraudulent notice of the birth of a child or of the marriage of any persons or of the death of any person, shall be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 281, § 27; G.L. 1909, ch. 347, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 399, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 610, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-3

.

11-18-4.
Concealment of birth out of wedlock.

Every woman who shall conceal the birth of any issue of her body, which, if it were born alive, would be born out of wedlock, so that it may not be known whether it was born dead or alive, or shall conceal the death of any infant child born of her body out of wedlock, so that it may not be known whether the child was murdered or not, shall be imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) months or be fined not exceeding three hundred dollars ($300).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 281, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 347, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 399, § 10; P.L. 1926, ch. 858, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 610, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-4

.

11-18-5.
Misrepresentation of circulation of periodical.

Every proprietor or publisher of a newspaper or periodical, or any agent or employee of the proprietor or publisher, who shall knowingly misrepresent the circulation of the newspaper or periodical for the purpose of securing advertising or other patronage, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1905, ch. 1251, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 43; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 43; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 41; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-5

.

11-18-6.
False financial statement to obtain loan or credit.

No person shall knowingly make or cause to be made, either directly or indirectly, or through any agency whatsoever, any false statement in writing, with intent that it shall be relied upon, respecting the financial condition, or means or ability to pay, of himself or herself, or any other person, firm, or corporation in whom he or she is interested, or for whom he or she is acting, for the purpose of procuring in any form whatsoever, either the delivery of personal property, the payment of cash, the making of a loan or credit, the extension of a credit, the discount of an account receivable, or the making, acceptance, discount, sale, or endorsement of a bill of exchange, or promissory note, for the benefit of either himself or herself or of such person, firm, or corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 809, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 53; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 50; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-6

.

11-18-7.
Procuring loan or credit on faith of false statement.

No person knowing that a false statement in writing has been made, respecting the financial condition or means or ability to pay, of himself or herself, or the person, firm, or corporation in which he or she is interested, or for whom he or she is acting, shall procure, upon the faith of the statement, for the benefit either of himself or herself, or of such person, firm, or corporation, either or any of the things of benefit as provided in §

11-18-6

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 809, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 54; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 51; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-7

.

11-18-8.
False representations as to continuing truth of financial statements.

No person knowing that a statement in writing has been made, respecting the financial condition or means or ability to pay, of himself or herself or the person, firm, or corporation, in which he or she is interested, or for whom he or she is acting, shall represent on a later day, either orally or in writing, that the statement previously made, if then again made on that day, would be then true, when in fact, that statement if then made would be false, and procure upon the faith of it, for the benefit either of himself or herself or of the person, firm, or corporation, either or any of the things of benefit as provided in §

11-18-6

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 809, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 55; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 52; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-8

.

11-18-9.
Penalty for financial misrepresentations.

Any person violating the provisions of §§

11-18-6

—

11-18-8

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction, shall be punished for each offense by imprisonment not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1912, ch. 809, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 56; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 53; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-9

.

11-18-10.
False statements in advertising.

No person, firm, corporation, or association with intent to sell or in any way dispose of merchandise, securities, service or anything offered by that person, firm, corporation or association, directly or indirectly, to the public for sale or distribution, or with intent to increase the consumption of or to induce the public in any manner to enter into any obligation relating to the merchandise or service, or to acquire title to it or an interest in it, shall make, publish, disseminate, circulate, or place before the public, or cause directly or indirectly to be made, published, disseminated, circulated, or placed before the public, in this state, in a newspaper or other publication, or in the form of a book, notice, handbill, poster, sign, billboard, bill, circular, pamphlet, or letter, or by means of a photograph, motion pictures, radio, loudspeaker, television, telephone, telegraph, or in any other way, an advertisement of any sort regarding merchandise, securities, service or anything so offered to the public, which advertisement contains any assertion, representation, or statement of fact which is untrue and designed to be deceptive or misleading or is intended or designed not to sell the merchandise, securities, service, or anything so advertised at the price stated in it, or otherwise communicated or with intent not to sell the merchandise, securities, service, or anything so advertised.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association who shall violate any of the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or be imprisoned not more than ninety (90) days, or shall suffer both fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1914, ch. 1073, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 57; P.L. 1928, ch. 1199, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 54; P.L. 1956, ch. 3761, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-10

.

11-18-11.
Immunity of publishers and advertising media.

The provisions of § 11-8-10 shall not apply to any radio station, television station, publisher of a newspaper, magazine or other publication or any other recognized advertising media or printer who publishes or prints the advertisement without actual knowledge of its falsity. The fact of the publishing or printing of the advertisement shall not be prima facie evidence of actual knowledge of falsity or deceptiveness.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 54; P.L. 1956, ch. 3761, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-11

.

11-18-12.
Injunction of false advertising.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, when it appears to the director of business regulation of the state of Rhode Island that any person, firm, corporation, or association is violating any of the provisions of §

11-18-10

, the director of business regulation may cause to be instituted an action, commenced in the name of the director of business regulation in his or her capacity as director of business regulation, to enjoin the violation in the superior court and the court shall have jurisdiction to enjoin and/or restrain any person, firm, corporation or association from violating any of the provisions of §

11-18-10

without regard to whether criminal proceedings have been or may be instituted.

When it appears to the director of labor and training of the state of Rhode Island that any person, firm, corporation, or association is violating any of the provisions of §

11-18-10

with respect to the offer or sale of liquid fuels, lubricating oils or other similar products, the director of labor and training may cause to be instituted an action, commenced in the name of the director of labor and training in his or her capacity as director of labor and training, to enjoin the violation in the superior court and the court shall have jurisdiction to enjoin and/or restrain any person, firm, corporation, or association from violating any of the provisions of §

11-18-10

with respect to the offer or sale of liquid fuels, lubricating oils or other similar products without regard to whether criminal proceedings have been or may be instituted.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 54; P.L. 1956, ch. 3761, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-12

; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 3, § 2.

11-18-13.
Deception in sale of fuels and lubricants.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation, to store, sell, expose for sale, or offer for sale, any liquid fuels, lubricating oils, or other similar products, in any manner whatsoever, so as to deceive or tend to deceive the purchaser as to the nature, quality, and identity, of the product so sold or offered for sale.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1189, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 51; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-13

.

11-18-14.
Sale of fuels and lubricants other than those shown by trade name on container.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation, to store, keep, expose for sale offer for sale, or sell, from any tank or container, or from any pump, or other distributing device or equipment, any liquid fuels, lubricating oils, or other similar products other than those indicated by the name, trade name, symbol, sign, or other distinguishing mark, or device, of the manufacturer or distributor, appearing upon the tank, container, pump, or other distributing equipment, from which the products are sold, offered for sale, or distributed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1189, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 52; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-14

.

11-18-15.
Imitation of trade symbols of fuels and lubricants.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation, to disguise or camouflage that person’s or firm’s own equipment, by imitating the design, symbol or trade name of the equipment under which recognized brands of liquid fuels, lubricating oils, and similar products are generally marketed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1189, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 53; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-15

.

11-18-16.
Sale of fuels and lubricants under false trademark or name — Adulteration.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation, to expose for sale, offer for sale, or sell under any trademark or trade name in general use, any liquid fuels, lubricating oils, or other like products, except those manufactured or distributed by the manufacturer or distributor marketing liquid fuels, lubricating oils, or other like products, under the trademark or trade name, or to substitute, mix, or adulterate, the liquid fuels, lubricating oils, or other similar products, sold, offered for sale, or distributed, under the trademark or trade name.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1189, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 54; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-16

.

11-18-17.
Delivery of fuels and lubricants into container bearing false trade name.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation, to aid or assist any other person, firm, or corporation, in the violation of §§

11-18-13

—

11-18-16

by depositing or delivering into any tank, receptacle, or other container, any other liquid fuels, lubricating oils, or like products, than those intended to be stored in and distributed from it, as indicated by the name of the manufacturer or distributor or the trademark or trade name of the product displayed on the container itself, or on the pump or other distributing device used in connection with it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1189, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 55; G.L. 1956, §§

11-18-17

.

11-18-18.
Penalty for violations with respect to fuels and lubricants.

Any person, firm, or corporation or any officer, agent, servant, or employee who shall violate any provision of §§

11-18-13

—

11-18-17

shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than three hundred dollars ($300), or be imprisoned ninety (90) days, or shall suffer both fine and imprisonment, and each separate sale or attempt to sell in violation of these provisions shall be deemed a separate offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1928, ch. 1189, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 56; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-18

.

11-18-19.
Repealed.

11-18-20.
Obtaining vehicles with intent to defraud.

By trick or false representation. Whoever with intent to defraud the owner or any person lawfully possessing any motor vehicle obtains the custody of the motor vehicle by trick, deceit, fraudulent or willful false representation, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and punished as provided in this section.

Hiring with intent to defraud. Whoever with intent to defraud the owner or any person lawfully possessing any motor vehicle, or the rental of a motor vehicle, hires a vehicle from the owner, or the owner’s agents or any person in lawful possession of it, shall, upon conviction, be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor. The absconding without paying or offering to pay the hire shall be prima facie evidence of fraudulent intent.

Failure to redeliver hired vehicle. Whoever, after hiring a motor vehicle under an agreement to redeliver the vehicle to the person letting the motor vehicle or that person’s agent, at the termination of the period for which it was let, shall, without the consent of that person or those persons and with intent to defraud, abandon, or willfully refuse or neglect to redeliver the vehicle as agreed shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor. The failure to return the motor vehicle within seventy-two (72) hours of the time agreed shall be prima facie evidence of fraudulent intent and the vehicle shall be considered “stolen” for purposes of reporting the offense to the local police.

Tampering with mileage device. Whoever, after hiring a motor vehicle from any person or persons under an agreement to pay for the use of the motor vehicle a sum of money determinable either in whole or in part upon the distance the motor vehicle travels during the period for which hired, removes, attempts to remove, tampers with, or attempts to tamper with or otherwise interfere with any odometer or other mechanical device attached to the hired motor vehicle for the purpose of registering the distance the vehicle travels, with the intent to deceive the person or persons letting the vehicle or their lawful agent as to the actual distance traveled, shall, upon conviction, be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor. Any person who shall knowingly aid, abet or assist another in violating the provisions of this subsection shall be proceeded against as a principal or as an accessory before the fact, and, upon conviction, shall suffer the same punishment as that to the principal offender is subject. Any person violating the provisions of this subsection may be charged with a violation in the city or town or county, as the case may be, where the odometer or other mechanical device:

Is removed, or attempted to be removed, or tampered with; or attempted to be tampered with, or is otherwise interfered with;

Where the persons knowingly aid, abet, or assist another to so remove, tamper with or otherwise interfere with the odometer or other mechanical device; or

Where any part of the motor vehicle upon which is attached the odometer or other mechanical device is removed or attempted to be removed.

Penalty. Any person convicted of violation of any provision of subsection (a), (b), (c) or (d) of this section shall be imprisoned for a term of not more than one year, or by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 40; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 44; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 44; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 44; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-20

; P.L. 1965, ch. 179, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 78, § 1.

11-18-20.1.
Possession of false identification.

The possession of a motor vehicle operator’s license card or other documents commonly used to identify the bearer containing a photograph of the possessor, but with the name, or date of birth of a person other than that of the possessor, shall be punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 106, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 148, § 2.

11-18-21.
Cheating of coin-operated devices.

Whoever: (1) operates or causes to be operated, or attempts to operate or to cause to be operated, any automatic vending machine, slot machine, turnstile, meter, register, coin-box telephone, or other receptacle designed to receive lawful coin of the United States in connection with the sale, use, or enjoyment of property, transportation, or other service, by means of a slug or any false, counterfeited, mutilated, or sweated coin or by any means, method, trick, or device whatsoever not lawfully authorized by the owner, lessee, or licensee of the machine, turnstile, meter, register, coin-box telephone, or receptacle; or (2) takes, obtains, or receives from or in connection with any automatic vending machine, slot machine, turnstile, meter, register, coin-box telephone, or other receptacle designed to receive lawful coins of the United States in connection with the sale, use, or enjoyment of property or service, any goods, wares, merchandise, transportation, gas, electric current, article of value, or the use or enjoyment of any transportation or any telephone or telegraph facilities or service, or of any musical instrument, phonograph, or other property, without depositing in and surrendering to the machine, turnstile, coin-box telephone, or other receptacle lawful coin to the amount required by the owner, lessee, or licensee of the machine, turnstile, coin-box telephone, or receptacle, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100), or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 76; P.L. 1932, ch. 1891, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 84; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-21

.

11-18-22.
Manufacture or distribution of slugs.

Whoever manufactures for sale, advertises for sale, sells, offers for sale, or gives away any slug, device, or substance whatsoever, designed or calculated to be placed or deposited in any automatic vending machine, slot machine, turnstile, meter, register, coin-box telephone, or other receptacle, depository, or contrivance, designed to receive lawful coin of the United States in connection with the sale, use, or enjoyment of property or service, with the intent that the slug, device, or substance shall be used to cheat or defraud the person entitled to the contents of the machine, turnstile, meter, register, coin-box telephone, or other the receptacle, depository, or contrivance, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 77; P.L. 1932, ch. 1891, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 85; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-22

.

11-18-23.
Defacement or alteration of manufacturer’s serial number.

Any person who: (1) willfully removes, defaces, covers, alters, or destroys the manufacturer’s serial number or any other distinguishing number or identification mark on any machine or any electrical or mechanical device for the purpose of preventing the detection of a crime or defrauding the manufacturer or any seller or any purchaser of the machine or the electrical or mechanical device; or (2) being a dealer in merchandise or the agent, employee, or representative of a dealer, knowingly buys, sells, receives, disposes of, conceals, or knowingly has in his or her possession any machine or any electrical or mechanical device from which the manufacturer’s serial number or any other distinguishing number or identification mark has been removed, defaced, covered, altered, or destroyed for a purpose specified in subdivision (1) of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2704, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-23

.

11-18-24.
Penalty for serial number violations.

Every person convicted of a misdemeanor for the violation of any provision of §

11-18-23

shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1951, ch. 2704, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-24

.

11-18-25.
Concealment or transfer of property with intent to defraud creditors.

Every person who, while insolvent, shall, with intent to defraud his or her creditors, remove from out of the state, secrete, or unlawfully transfer or otherwise dispose of any property belonging to his or her estate, which is not exempt from attachment by law, or who, having made an assignment for the benefit of creditors, shall secrete, destroy, or withhold from his or her assignee any books, deeds, documents, or writings relating to the property, shall, upon conviction of the offense, be imprisoned not exceeding two (2) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 67; P.L. 1902, ch. 1000, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 70; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 70; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 77; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-25

.

11-18-26.
Obtaining food or accommodations with intent to defraud.

Every person who shall obtain credit or accommodation at any hotel, inn, restaurant, boarding house, or lodging house by means of any false pretense, or who, with intent to defraud the proprietor, or the proprietor’s agent or servant, obtains any credit or accommodation at a hotel, inn, restaurant, boarding house or lodging house, without paying, shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00) or be imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) days.

Proof that lodging, food or other accommodation was obtained by false or fictitious showing or pretense of baggage, or that the person refused or neglected to pay for the food, lodging, or other accommodation, or removed or caused to be removed his or her baggage from the premises, without paying for the food, lodging, or other accommodation, shall be presumptive evidence of the fraudulent intent referred to in subsection (a) of this section; but this provision shall not apply where there has been a special agreement for delay in payment.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 51; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 54; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 54; P.L. 1927, ch. 1047, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 62; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-26

.

11-18-27.
Sale of false diplomas or certificates.

Any person who unlawfully sells, buys, creates, duplicates, alters, gives, or obtains or attempts to buy, sell, create, duplicate, alter, give, or obtain a diploma or certificate of enrollment, conferred by an accredited institution of education in any country, with the intent to use fraudulently the document or to allow the fraudulent use of the document, shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction shall be sentenced for not more than two (2) years in jail or fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 62; P.L. 1952, ch. 2895, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-27

; P.L. 1990, ch. 104, § 1.

11-18-28.
False animal registrations and pedigrees.

Every person who by any false pretense shall obtain from any club, association, society, or company for improving the breed of cattle, horses, sheep, swine, or other domestic animals, the registration of any animal in the herd register or other register of the club, association, society or company, or who knowingly shall obtain a transfer of that registration, and every person who shall knowingly give a false pedigree of any animal, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for a term not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 19; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-28

.

11-18-29.
Fraudulent stock certificates.

Every president, secretary, cashier, treasurer, or other officer or agent of any incorporated company or institution, who shall fraudulently issue any stock or certificate of stock of the company or institution, shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and shall be imprisoned not exceeding ten (10) years, nor less than one year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

11-18-29

.

11-18-30.
Prearranged funerals — Receipt of money with intent to defraud.

No person may arrange, promote, enter into, or sell any funeral service contract on behalf of a funeral service establishment unless the person is an embalmer or funeral director licensed in accordance with the provisions of chapter 33.2 of title 5. All monies received under these contracts shall be placed into segregated escrow accounts and marked accordingly. Any funeral director or licensed employee who receives monies under the contracts with intent to defraud the purchaser shall, upon conviction, be imprisoned for not more than one year or fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). Failure to hold such monies under the contract in segregated escrow accounts shall be prima facie evidence of the intent to defraud.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 382, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 103, § 2.

11-18-31.
Solicitation in name of law enforcement agency.

No professional solicitor shall solicit money from any individual or business in the name of any law enforcement agency or any organization which would reasonably appear to be affiliated in any way with any law enforcement agency or personnel. For the purposes of this section, “professional solicitor” means any firm or corporation or any person other than a sworn police officer or retired police officer in the agency or organization for which the solicitation is being made, who, for compensation or other consideration, solicits contributions for or on behalf of another.

No person shall solicit money in the name of any law enforcement agency or any organization which would reasonably appear to be affiliated in any way with any law enforcement agency or personnel, unless notification is given to the superintendent of the state police and the police chief of the municipality in which solicitations shall be conducted.

Only sworn police officers and retired police officers shall solicit money in the name of any law enforcement agency or any organization which would reasonably appear to be affiliated in any way with any law enforcement agency or personnel. Every sworn police officer and retired police officer so soliciting shall identify himself or herself by name, rank, department and status as an active or retired police officer to each person solicited. If the solicitation is done by telephone, the same officer or retired officer who makes the telephone solicitation shall personally appear before the donor to accept the donation.

Any person, firm, or corporation violating the provisions of this section shall be punished by imprisonment not exceeding two (2) years and/or fined in an amount not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 208, § 1.

11-18-32.
Video, audio and publication rentals.

It shall be unlawful for any person to reveal, transmit, publish, or disseminate in any manner, any records which would identify the names and addresses of individuals, with the titles or nature of video films, records, cassettes, or the like, which they purchased, leased, rented, or borrowed, from libraries, book stores, video stores, or record and cassette shops or any retailer or distributor of those products, whether or not the identities and listings are kept in a remote computing service or electronic storage or the disclosure is made through or by a remote computing service. It shall not be unlawful to make disclosures to other employees of the library or business incident to the normal course of their work or pursuant to lawful compulsion.

All records of such transactions shall be maintained as confidential and may only be released by written waiver.

Any person, firm, or corporation violating the provisions of this section shall be punished by a fine in an amount not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation, or by imprisonment not exceeding six (6) months, or both.

Any person injured as a result of a violation of this section may bring a civil action against the violator for actual damages or two hundred fifty dollars ($250), whichever is greater, for each violation, plus reasonable attorneys’ fees and court costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 94, § 1.

11-18-33.
Defrauding the administration of a drug or alcohol test.

As used in this section, “defraud the administration of a drug or alcohol test” means to submit a substance that purports to be from a person other than its actual source, or purports to have been excreted or collected at a time other than when it was actually excreted or collected, or to otherwise engage in conduct intended to produce a false or misleading outcome of a test for the presence of alcohol or a chemical, drug or controlled dangerous substance, or metabolite of a drug or controlled dangerous substance, in the human body. It shall specifically include, but not be limited to, the furnishing of urine with the purpose that the urine be submitted for urinalysis as a true specimen of a person.

Any person who offers for sale or rental, or who manufactures, markets, sells, transfers or gives to any person, any instrument or tool, devise or substance adapted, designed or commonly used to defraud the administration of a drug or alcohol test with the intent to defraud the administration, is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to imprisonment for up to one year and a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

Any person who knowingly defrauds the administration of a drug or alcohol test that is administered as a condition of monitoring a person on bail, in custody or on parole, probation or pretrial intervention, or any other form of supervision administered in connection with a criminal offense or juvenile delinquency matter, is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to imprisonment for up to one year and a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 141, § 1.